Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.137

Reestablishment of service credit by former members who are members of the public employees' retirement system—Conditions.

Former members of the retirement system established under this chapter who are currently members of the retirement system governed by chapter 41.40 RCW are permitted to reestablish service credit with the system subject to the following:

(1) The former member must have separated and withdrawn contributions from the system prior to January 1, 1966, and not returned to membership since that date;

(2) The former member must have been employed by the department of licensing, or its predecessor agency, in a capacity related to drivers' license examining within thirty days after leaving commissioned status with the state patrol; and

(3) The former member must make payment to the system of the contributions withdrawn with interest at the rate set by the director from the date of withdrawal to the date of repayment. Such payment must be made no later than June 30, 1986.

[ 1986 c 154 s 2.]